Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-3,115
Improvement districts; estimate of cost; bids; advertisement.

A city shall, when it creates an improvement district for paving, repaving, curbing, or guttering, or other improvements of like character, prepare an estimate of the cost of such improvement and shall thereafter advertise for and receive bids upon such material as may be designated by the city for such improvement. The advertisements, specifications for bids, and petitions designating materials shall contain such information and be worded in such language as the city may from time to time direct. All bids shall be received and opened at the same time as provided by ordinance except as otherwise provided in section 14-3,111. The city may reject any and all bids.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 32, p. 207;

Laws 1972, LB 1046, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 119.
July 21, 2022